Washington statutes.
RCW 9.45.170

Penalty.

Any person violating any of the provisions of RCW 9.45.160, shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished by imprisonment in the penitentiary for not more than five years nor less than one year, or imprisonment in the county jail for any length of time not exceeding one year.

[ 1909 c 202 s 2. No RRS.]